apertium-br-fr/apertium-br-fr.fr.metadix
    <pardef n="appart/enir__vblex">
            
<e><p><l>enaient</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>enais</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>enais</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>enait</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>enant</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>enant</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>enez</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>enez</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
            
<e><p><l>enez</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>eniez</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>eniez</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>enions</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>enions</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>enir</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>enons</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>enons</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
            
<e><p><l>enons</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>enu</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>enue</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>enues</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>enus</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>iendra</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>iendrai</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>iendraient</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>iendrais</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>iendrais</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>iendrait</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>iendras</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>iendrez</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>iendriez</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>iendrions</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>iendrons</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>iendront</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ienne</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ienne</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>iennent</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>iennent</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>iennes</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>iens</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>iens</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
            
<e><p><l>iens</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>iens</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ient</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>inrent</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ins</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ins</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>insse</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>inssent</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>insses</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>inssiez</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>inssions</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>int</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>înmes</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>înt</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>întes</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

          <e lm="détenir" r="LR"><i>dét</i><par n="appart/enir__vblex"/></e>
          <e lm="intervenir"><i>interv</i><par n="appart/enir__vblex"/></e>
          <e lm="maintenir"><i>maint</i><par n="appart/enir__vblex"/></e>
          <e lm="obtenir"><i>obt</i><par n="appart/enir__vblex"/></e>
          <e lm="parvenir"><i>parv</i><par n="appart/enir__vblex"/></e>
          <e lm="provenir"><i>prov</i><par n="appart/enir__vblex"/></e>
          <e lm="retenir"><i>ret</i><par n="appart/enir__vblex"/></e>
          <e lm="soutenir" r="LR"><i>sout</i><par n="appart/enir__vblex"/></e>
          <e lm="advenir" a="fulup"><i>adv</i><par n="appart/enir__vblex"/></e>
		  <e lm="appartenir"><i>appart</i><par n="appart/enir__vblex"/></e>
          <e lm="contenir"><i>cont</i><par n="appart/enir__vblex"/></e>
          <e lm="convenir"><i>conv</i><par n="appart/enir__vblex"/></e>
          <e lm="convenir à" a="fulup" r="LR"><i>conv</i><par n="appart/enir__vblex"/><p><l><b/>à</l><r><g><b/>à</g></r></p></e>
          <e lm="convenir à" a="fulup" r="RL"><i>conv</i><par n="appart/enir__vblex"/><p><l><b/><a/>à</l><r><g><b/>à</g></r></p></e>
          <e lm="devenir"><i>dev</i><par n="appart/enir__vblex"/></e>
          <e lm="devenir fou" a="fulup"><i>dev</i><par n="appart/enir__vblex"/><p><l><b/>fou</l><r><g><b/>fou</g></r></p></e>
          <e lm="entretenir" r="LR"><i>entret</i><par n="appart/enir__vblex"/></e>
          <e lm="entretenir des relations avec" a="fulup"><i>entret</i><par n="appart/enir__vblex"/><p><l><b/>des<b/>relations<b/>avec</l><r><g><b/>des<b/>relations<b/>avec</g></r></p></e>
          <e lm="prévenir"><i>prév</i><par n="appart/enir__vblex"/></e>
          <e lm="revenir"><i>rev</i><par n="appart/enir__vblex"/></e>
          <e lm="soutenir" a="eleka"><i>sout</i><par n="appart/enir__vblex"/></e>
          <e lm="souvenir" a="eleka"><i>souv</i><par n="appart/enir__vblex"/></e>
		  <e lm="tenir"><i>t</i><par n="appart/enir__vblex"/></e>
          <e lm="tenir à un cheveu" a="webform"><i>t</i><par n="appart/enir__vblex"/><p><l><b/>à<b/>un<b/>cheveu</l><r><g><b/>à<b/>un<b/>cheveu</g></r></p></e>
          <e lm="tenir informé" a="fulup"><i>t</i><par n="appart/enir__vblex"/><p><l><b/>informé</l><r><g><b/>informé</g></r></p></e>
          <e lm="tenir pour dit et d’accord" a="eleka"><i>t</i><par n="appart/enir__vblex"/><p><l><b/>pour<b/>dit<b/>et<b/>d’accord</l><r><g><b/>pour<b/>dit<b/>et<b/>d’accord</g></r></p></e>
          <e lm="venir"><i>v</i><par n="appart/enir__vblex"/></e>
          <e lm="venir"><i>v</i><par n="appart/enir__vblex"/><p><l><b/>de</l><r><g><b/>de</g></r></p></e>
          <e lm="venir"><i>v</i><par n="appart/enir__vblex"/><p><l><b/>en</l><r><g><b/>en</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="revenir à ses moutons" a="webform"><i>rev</i><par n="appart/enir__vblex"/><p><l><b/>à<b/>ses<b/>moutons</l><r><g><b/>à<b/>ses<b/>moutons</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="convenir verbalement de" a="eleka">
  <i>conv</i>
  <par n="appart/enir__vblex"/>
  <p>
    <l><b/>verbalement<b/>de</l>
    <r><g><b/>verbalement<b/>de</g></r>
  </p>
</e>
<e lm="intervenir" a="eleka">
  <i>interv</i>
  <par n="appart/enir__vblex"/>
</e>
<e lm="obtenir" a="eleka">
  <i>obt</i>
  <par n="appart/enir__vblex"/>
</e>
<e lm="obtenir" a="eleka" r="RL">
  <i>obt</i>
  <par n="appart/enir__vblex"/>
</e>
<e lm="prévenir" a="eleka" r="RL">
  <i>prév</i>
  <par n="appart/enir__vblex"/>
</e>
<e lm="retenir la carte" a="eleka">
  <i>ret</i>
  <par n="appart/enir__vblex"/>
<p>
    <l><b/>la<b/>carte</l>
    <r><g><b/>la<b/>carte</g></r>
  </p>
</e>
<e lm="abstenir" a="eleka"><i>abst</i><par n="appart/enir__vblex"/></e>
